Hawaii statutes.
[PART
VI.] SPECIAL FACILITY PROJECTS

Note

Grants for projects; exemption from chapter 42F. L 2001, c
180, §4.

[§206E-181] Definitions. For the
purpose of this part, if not inconsistent with the context:

"Special facility" means one or more
buildings or structures and the land thereof for the construction of facilities
that provides benefits to the community at large including, without limitation,
an ocean science center that incorporates research and education programs and
which is the subject of a special facility lease.

"Special facility lease" includes a
contract, lease, or other agreement, or any combination thereof, the subject
matter of which is the same special facility. [L 2001, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next